Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 14. REGULATION OF MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRANSPORTATION

SUBTITLE A. REGULATIONS RELATED TO MOTOR VEHICLES

Chapter 2311, consisting of Secs. 2311.001, was added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 1732), Sec. 1.

For another Chapter 2311, consisting of Secs. 2311.0101 to 2311.0402, added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1153 (S.B. 1001), Sec. 1, see Sec. 2311.0101 et seq., post.

CHAPTER 2311. ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING STATIONS

Sec. 2311.001. ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING STATION STANDARDS. (a) This section applies only to an electric vehicle charging station that is:

(1) installed after December 1, 2024;

(2) made available to the public;

(3) not intended primarily for private use; and

(4) funded through public grants or state rebate programs.

(b) The Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation, in consultation with the Texas Department of Transportation, shall adopt standards for electric vehicle charging stations that require the charging stations to be equipped with a standard electric vehicle charging connector or plug type that is widely compatible with as many electric vehicles as practicable.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 1732), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2023.